Illinois, session 104th, HB4659.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Installment Loan Act is amended by 5adding Section 20.8 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 670/20.8 new)7    Sec. 20.8. Coerced debt.8    (a) In this Section, "coerced debt" means any debt 9incurred through a loan subject to this Act or a portion of the 10debt, except for debt secured by real property, that was 11incurred by the debtor because of fraud, duress, intimidation, 12threat, force, coercion, undue influence, or the 13non-consensual use of the debtor's personal identifying 14information between family or household members, as defined in 15Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, as a 16result of abuse or exploitation, as defined in Section 103 of 17the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, or due to human 18trafficking, as defined in subsections (b), (c), and (d) of 19Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012.20    (b) In any lawsuit or arbitration to collect a debt, 21subject to this Act, it is an affirmative defense that the debt 22is or is partially coerced debt to the plaintiff and the court 23or arbitrator.